Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.080

Advising resources—Identification of officials, resources, programs, and students.

Each institution of higher education is encouraged to tailor advising resources for any enrolled student who is the recipient of a college bound scholarship. The institutions of higher education should identify campus officials, resources, programs, and other college bound scholarship students available to work with college bound scholarship recipients.

[ 2015 c 244 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2015 c 244: See note following RCW 28B.118.010.